src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs_D
überragen:überrag W_OHNE-GE ;
überstreifen:überstreif W_OHNE-GE ;
LEXICON Verbs_D-NOge
anlassen:anlass W_OHNE-GE ;
billigen:billig W_OHNE-GE ;
dauen:dau W_OHNE-GE ;
eidigen:eidig W_OHNE-GE ;
fremden:fremde W_OHNE-GE ;
grünen:grün W_OHNE-GE ;
hüten:hüte W_OHNE-GE ;
larven:larv W_OHNE-GE ;
mieten:miete W_OHNE-GE ;
pflichten:pflichte W_OHNE-GE ;
schanzen:schanz W_OHNE-GE ;
schütten:schütte W_OHNE-GE ;
strafen:straf W_OHNE-GE ;
treuen:treu W_OHNE-GE ;
wecken:weck W_OHNE-GE ;
zieren:zier W_OHNE-GE ;
LEXICON VERBS_01
haben:ha V_haben__vbhaver ; !a:-a:-a-ä-a
können:konn V_/können__vbmod ; !ö-a-o-ö-o
mögen:mog V_/mögen__vbmod ; !ö:-a:-o-ö-o
müssen:muss V_/müssen__vbmod ;
dürfen:darf V_/dürfen__vbmod ;
sollen:soll V_/sollen__vbmod ;
werden:w V_/werden__vaux ; !e-i-a-ä-o
wollen:w V_/wollen__vaux ; !o-i-o-o-o
werden:w V_/werden__vblex ; !e-i-a-ä-o
legen:leg W ;
alarmieren:alarmier W_OHNE-GE ;
brillieren:brillier W_OHNE-GE ;
digitalisieren:digitalisier W_OHNE-GE ;
explodieren:explodier W_OHNE-GE ;
gastieren:gastier W_OHNE-GE ;
halbieren:halbier W_OHNE-GE ;
interessieren:interessier W_OHNE-GE ;
kombinieren:kombinier W_OHNE-GE ;
kreieren:kreier W_OHNE-GE ;
missbilligen:missbillig W_OHNE-GE ;
parodieren:parodier W_OHNE-GE ;
profitieren:profitier W_OHNE-GE ;
rebellieren:rebellier W_OHNE-GE ;
revitalisieren:revitalisier W_OHNE-GE ;
spezialisieren:spezialisier W_OHNE-GE ;
torpedieren:torpedier W_OHNE-GE ;
vollstrecken:vollstreck W_OHNE-GE ;
kurbeln:kurbel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
bejubeln:bejubel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
möbeln:möbel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
pöbeln:pöbel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
recyceln:recycel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
besiedeln:besiedel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
wedeln:wedel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
verhandeln:verhandel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
verwandeln:verwandel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
verzweifeln:verzweifel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
nageln:nagel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
versiegeln:versiegel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
regeln:regel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
hangeln:hangel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
tingeln:tingel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
schlängeln:schlängel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
vögeln:vögel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
überflügeln:überflügel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
verprügeln:verprügel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
stacheln:stachel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
wackeln:wackel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
zerstückeln:zerstückel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
gaukeln:gaukel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
versammeln:versammel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
überrumpeln:überrumpel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
päppeln:päppel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
verwechseln:verwechsel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
erdrosseln:erdrossel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
verschlüsseln:verschlüssel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
zerbröseln:zerbrösel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
titeln:titel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
zetteln:zettel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
übermitteln:übermittel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
schmunzeln:schmunzel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
entwurzeln:entwurzel W_OHNE-GE_ACKERN ;
verhindern:verhinder W_ACKERN ;
befördern:beförder W_ACKERN ;
überlagern:überlager W_ACKERN ;
prangern:pranger W_ACKERN ;
verzögern:verzöger W_ACKERN ;
bevölkern:bevölker W_ACKERN ;
verschönern:verschöner W_ACKERN ;
verschlechtern:verschlechter W_ACKERN ;
erörtern:erörter W_ACKERN ;
erschüttern:erschütter W_ACKERN ;
besteuern:besteuer W_ACKERN ;
proben:prob W ;
kleiden:kleide W ;
fahnden:fahnde W ;
norden:norde W ;
skaten:skate W ;
nachten:nachte W ;
flüchten:flüchte W ;
booten:boote W ;
listen:liste W ;
wetten:wette W ;
töten:töte W ;
zapfen:zapf W ;
knöpfen:knöpf W ;
plagen:plag W ;
eggen:egg W ;
langen:lang W ;
reichen:reich W ;
rauschen:rausch W ;
erspähen:erspäh W ;
klicken:klick W ;
streiken:streik W ;
dribbeln:dribbel W_ACKERN ;
radeln:radel W_ACKERN ;
pendeln:pendel W_ACKERN ;
trudeln:trudel W_ACKERN ;
spiegeln:spiegel W_ACKERN ;
gurgeln:gurgel W_ACKERN ;
rascheln:raschel W_ACKERN ;
zielen:ziel W ;
krakeln:krakel W_ACKERN ;
munkeln:munkel W_ACKERN ;
wimmeln:wimmel W_ACKERN ;
taumeln:taumel W_ACKERN ;
simpeln:simpel W_ACKERN ;
wechseln:wechsel W_ACKERN ;
rätseln:rätsel W_ACKERN ;
schütteln:schüttel W_ACKERN ;
wallen:wall W ;
schälen:schäl W ;
formen:form W ;
argwöhnen:argwöhn W ;
lumpen:lump W ;
säubern:säuber W_ACKERN ;
sondern:sonder W_ACKERN ;
liefern:liefer W_ACKERN ;
stenographieren:stenographier W ;
ackern:acker W_ACKERN ;
dämmern:dämmer W_ACKERN ;
leichtern:leichter W_ACKERN ;
lästern:läster W_ACKERN ;
dauern:dauer W_ACKERN ;
flirren:flirr W ;
losen:los W ;
streuen:streu W ;
würzen:würz W ;
säen:sä W ;
